Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB733.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2006-H(a) and (c) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, added July 17, 2024 (P.L.818, No.69), are amended to read:Section 2006-H. Exit counseling.(a) General rule.--[Unless an individual selects not to participate, each] Each institution of higher education that receives information regarding Federal education loans or other student loans that may require repayment for a student enrolled at the institution of higher education shall make financial aid counseling available to each student at the end of the student's final academic term, unless the individual selects not to participate.1234567891011121314151617181920 * * *(c) Counseling for students who transfer or withdraw.--With respect to a student who leaves an institution of higher education without the knowledge of the institution or transfers to another institution, the institution shall attempt to make financial aid counseling available to the student[.] unless the student has Federal education loans or other student loans known to the institution of higher education that do not require repayment. If the institution is unable to get in contact with the student, the institution shall mail the information described in subsection (b) in writing to the student at the last known address on file.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0733PN0785 - 2 - 1234567891011121314